Inflection/Endings/Endings.foma
load stack ../../Morphonology/Alternations/Alternations.bin
invert net
define Alternations;
read lexc Endings.lexc
define StandardEnding;
read lexc NonStandardEndings.lexc
define NonStandardEnding;
source ../../LetterClasses.foma
source ../../ParadigmFeatures.foma
source ../../Properties.foma
define RemoveParDef ParadigmDefects -> 0 || _ ;
define RemoveNumHom NumberHom -> 0 || _ ;
define RemoveGrammRazr GrammRazr -> 0 || _ ;
define r1 %+Acc -> %+Nom || %+Neut Animacy %+Sing _ ;
define r2 %+Acc -> %+Nom || %+Subst2 Gender Animacy %+Sing _ ;
define r3 %+Acc -> %+Nom || %+Masc %+Inan %+Sing _ , %+Inan %+Plur _ ;
define r4 %+Acc -> %+Gen || %+Masc %+Anim %+Sing _ , %+Anim %+Plur _ ;
define Syncretism r1 .o. r2 .o. r3 .o. r4;
define RemoveAnimacy Animacy -> 0 || _ ;
define Rules RemoveParDef .o. RemoveNumHom .o. RemoveGrammRazr .o. Syncretism .o. RemoveAnimacy;
define W Letter+ (Sep Letter*);
define RemoveNse NonStandEnding -> 0 || _ ;
set flag-is-epsilon ON
define Endings Alternations .o. Rules .o. [W NonStandardEnding Tail .P. [RemoveNse .o. W StandardEnding (ConvStress) (AccType)]];
